


Trump doesn't owe Obama an apology. The people who manipulated and used him throughout his life owe him an apology.

Russian intelligence recruits a lot of people, but they are especially concerned, even obsessed, with recruiting the people with the most potential for their purposes--people who simultaneously possess great talent and great weakness, whom they hoped to mold, influence, and promote to positions of power:


https://www.usnews.com/news/articles/2009/07/17/declassified-documents-reveal-kgb-spies-in-the-us
	...newly released documents from U.S. and Soviet archives show that hundreds of people, from the famous to the obscure, crossed paths with Soviet intelligence during the pre-World War II years. They include the country's most famous physicist, Robert Oppenheimer, novelist Ernest Hemingway, and civil servants like Hiss.


http://www.independent.co.uk/news/einsteins-letters-show-affair-with-spy-1162418.html
	Einstein's letters show affair with spy

	...According to Special Tasks, Konenkova was supposed to "influence Oppenheimer and other prominent American scientists who she met at Princeton". Princeton University was home at the time to Einstein. It is known that she succeeded in introducing Einstein to the Soviet consul in New York.


https://www.fbi.gov/news/stories/operation-ghost-stories-inside-the-russian-spy-case
	The deep-cover Russian spies may not have achieved their objective, but they were not idle. They collected information and transmitted it back to Russia, and they were actively engaged in what is known in the spy business as “spotting and assessing.”

	They identified colleagues, friends, and others who might be vulnerable targets, and it is possible they were seeking to co-opt people they encountered in the academic environment who might one day hold positions of power and influence.

	Perhaps the most famous example of this tactic—the Cambridge Five—took place in Great Britain. Soviet intelligence “talent spotters” were able to recruit Cambridge University students in the 1930s—including future spy Kim Philby—who would later rise to power in the British government and become Soviet operatives during World War II and into the 1950s.

	“We believe the SVR illegals may well have hoped to do the same thing here,” said a counterintelligence agent.


Philby's life is a good example of how Russian intelligence tries to groom potential agents from a young age. Philby was [first introduced](https://books.google.com/books?id=i8ZPDqB_Ny0C&pg=PA47
) to socialist ideas no later than preparatory school, before being encouraged to devote himself to the communist cause by one of his [professors](http://spartacus-educational.com/Maurice_Dobb.htm) at Cambridge University. The professor's recommendations brought Philby to meet his first wife, herself an NKVD agent. Philby's wife encouraged him to work for the Soviets, and later arranged for him to meet other NKVD agents who would enlist Philby to spy for them more formally.

Philby's [father](http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/uknews/1414561/Philbys-father-seen-as-threat.html), himself a socialist, did not discourage his son's communism, and later recommended him to the deputy chief of MI6. Philby would spend much of his career at MI6, eventually rising to head of counterespionage operations there.

Philby's second wife, said to be vulnerable but loyal and caring, died under suspicious circumstances, a tragedy that some [writers](http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/2016/04/04/kim-philby-was-a-bad-liar-his-true-talent-lay-in-self-mythology/
) insinuate was carried-out by Philby himself. Philby's fourth wife, with whom he spent his final days after defecting to Moscow, [alleged](https://www.theguardian.com/world/2011/mar/31/spy-kim-philby-disillusioned-communism
) that Philby was suicidal in the days leading up to his controversial death on May 11, 1988.

Philby's greatest strength might also have been his greatest weakness: Philby knew his charm and wit could ingratiate himself with anybody he crossed paths with, even within the powerful circles of influence he had infiltrated. But his success at manipulating other people made it easy for him to be arrogant, maybe even for him to see the people around him as tools to be used for his ends rather than people to be treated with loyalty and respect. Ironically, this part of Philby's character made him ideal for being used himself by Soviet intelligence: the same kind of person who would look down on the people he lives and works with him would have less of a problem betraying those people. That said, Philby's belief that he was in control and could control those around him might even have extended to some of his Soviet comrades.

For the KGB, their task is a constant battle to gain influence over people who are themselves influential, or even people who might one day be influential:


http://uselessdissident.blogspot.com/2008/11/interview-with-yuri-bezmenov-part-three.html
	Most of the activity of the department was to compile a huge amount of information on individuals who were instrumental in creating public opinion: publishers, editors, journalists, actors, educationalists, professors of political science, members of parliament, representatives of business circles. Most of these people were divided roughly in two groups. Those who would toe the Soviet foreign policy, they would be promoted to the positions of power through media and public opinion manipulation.


Traces of such an effort can be seen with President Trump well before the 2016 election. [Reports](http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/nationworld/ct-trump-1996-presidential-race-20170112-story.html) of soviet-era records say the StB, who were closely associated with the KGB, kept records on Trump's first wife, Ivana, as far back as 30 years ago. Ivana would make frequent trips to Czechoslovakia without her husband. There she would visit her father, himself an StB informant, who would report on her visits to other agents. The StB gives some hints that Ivana's relationship with the StB was more developed than that of an unwitting espionage target: according to the report, Ivana was nervous for one trip, where she was supposed to meet a Czechoslovak security official, as she believed U.S. embassy staffers were following her. The StB learned from Ivana's visits that Trump was confident he could eventually run for President, which he was being pressured to do 1988, and they assessed that any mistake by Ivana could have immense consequences for him.

Trump left Ivana for his second wife, Marla Maples, in 1991, although it appears that someone [impersonating](http://people.com/celebrity/donald-trump-denies-pretending-to-be-his-publicist-in-newly-surfaced-recording/) Trump tried to create a rift in their relationship.

Other people close to Trump are worthy of scrutiny. Trump's enigmatic communications director, Hope Hicks, began her career at an [unusual](http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2009/10/27/AR2009102704010.html) PR [firm](https://qz.com/954169/jared-kushners-new-head-of-communications-is-appropriately-a-veteran-of-selling-blumhouse-horror-films-like-get-out-and-the-purge/), where she worked on accounts related to Trump's hospitality ventures, before ingratiating herself with Ivanka Trump and working her way into the graces of Donald Trump. As [one journalist](https://www.gq.com/story/hope-hicks-mystifying-triumph-donald-trump) points out, Hicks had possessed qualities that would help her win-over someone like Trump since childhood.

For Obama, there are hints of an effort to influence him from childhood. Former *Daily Telegraph* editor Toby Harnden [points](http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/worldnews/barackobama/2601914/Frank-Marshall-Davis-alleged-Communist-was-early-influence-on-Barack-Obama.html) to Communist activist Frank Marshall Davis as a possible negative influence on Obama's early years. Contrary to Harnden's depiction, Davis was a successful and persuasive intellectual, with a gift for writing about world events. But what Davis would "teach" in his writings was indistinguishable from Russian propaganda:


http://www.hawaii.edu/uhwo/clear/HonoluluRecord1/frankblog1949.html
	September 29, 1949: Atom Bombs and Peace

	Frank Marshall Davis

	I think we have reached the point where the big question, the key question, the question which the thought control boys have decided is the test for "loyalty," has become merely so much empty rhetoric.

	Specifically, I refer to the many variations of this basic question: "Would you fight for the United States in the event of a war with Russia?"

	I say this is so much rhetoric, so many wasted words, because if there is a war between America and the Soviet Union, I, for one, will take a last fond glance at this beautiful world of ours and prepare to bid it goodbye forever. Not even life in Timbuktu could survive World War III.

	This has been removed from the realm of speculation to the real­ity of grim fact with the recent and reluctant admission by President Truman that the Soviets have the atom bomb. This means, simply, that an A-bomb cannot be dropped on Moscow or Siberia without expecting a return of the compliment at Washington, D. C., or California.

	I phrase it this way because the only talk I have heard of using such bombs came from high officials of the American Legion, former U. S. ambassadors and other top-ranking politicians. If there has been similar talk in the Kremlin, our espionage agents have not mentioned it in the daily press. Instead, the men of Moscow speak of peace—something which is officially interpreted by the White House as a "Communist plot."


http://bookfi.net/dl/1026321/4847c5
	The "sleeper" now wakened was a general called Zhang Zhizhong (whom we shall refer to as ZZZ), commander of the Shanghai-Nanjing garrison. In 1925 he had been a teacher at Whampoa, the Russian-funded and Russian-staffed military academy near Canton. From the day of its founding, Moscow made a determined effort to plant high-level agents in the Nationalist military.

	...on 9 August, without authorisation, ZZZ staged an incident outside Shanghai airport, where a Chinese army unit, which he himself had specially stationed there, shot dead a Japanese marine lieutenant and a private. A Chinese prisoner under sentence of death was then dressed in a Chinese uniform and shot dead at the airport gate, to make it seem that the Japanese had fired first. The Japanese gave every sign of wishing to defuse the incident, but ZZZ still bombarded Chiang with requests to launch an offensive, which Chiang vetoed. On the morning of the 13th, the Generalissimo told ZZZ not to launch a war "on impulse," but to "study and discuss" all the angles again, and then submit his plan. ZZZ pressed next day: "This army is determined to start the offensive against the enemy at 5 p.m. today Here is the plan. . ." On the 14th, Chinese planes bombed the Japanese flagship Izumo, as well as troops and navy planes on the ground, and ZZZ ordered a general offensive. But Chiang stopped him: "You must not attack this evening. Wait for order."  
 
    When no order arrived, ZZZ outflanked Chiang by issuing a press release next day; claiming, falsely; that Japanese warships had shelled Shanghai and that Japanese troops had started attacking the Chinese. With anti-Japanese feeling running high, Chiang was put on the spot. The following day; 16 August, he finally gave the order: "General assault for dawn tomorrow."
 
    But after one day's fighting, Chiang ordered a halt, on the 18th. ZZZ simply ignored the order and expanded his offensives. All-out war became unstoppable as large Japanese reinforcements began to arrive on 22 August.

    ...Moscow was exhilarated by the turn of events, as the Soviet foreign minister, Maksim Litvinov, admitted to French vice-premier Leon Blum. According to Blum, Litvinov told him that "he [Litvinov] and the Soviet Union were perfectly delighted that Japan had attacked China [adding] that the Soviet Union hoped that way between China and Japan would continue just as long as possible..."


http://www.nytimes.com/2003/03/05/world/new-study-supports-idea-stalin-was-poisoned.html
	New Study Supports Idea Stalin Was Poisoned

	By MICHAEL WINES

	Fifty years after Stalin died, felled by a brain hemorrhage at his dacha, an exhaustive study of long-secret Soviet records lends new weight to an old theory that he was actually poisoned, perhaps to avert a looming war with the United States.

	That war may well have been closer than anyone outside the Kremlin suspected at the time, say the authors of a new book based on the records.
	
	...Why Stalin might have been killed is a less difficult question. Politburo members lived in fear of Stalin; beyond that, the book cites a previously secret report as evidence that Stalin was preparing to add a new dimension to the alleged American conspiracy known as the Doctors' Plot.

	That report -- an interrogation of a supposed American agent named Ivan I. Varfolomeyev, in 1951 -- indicated that the Kremlin was preparing to accuse the United States of a plot to destroy much of Moscow with a new nuclear weapon, then to launch an invasion of Soviet territory along the Chinese border.

	Mr. Varfolomeyev's fantastic plot was known in Soviet documents as "the plan of the internal blow." Stalin, the book states, had assigned the Varfolomeyev case highest priority, and was preparing to proceed with a public trial despite his underlings' fears that the charges were so unbelievable that they would make the Kremlin a global laughingstock.

	Mr. Naumov said in an interview today that that plan, combined with other Soviet military preparations in the Russian Far East at the time, strongly suggest that Stalin was preparing for a war along the United States' Pacific Coast. What remains unclear, he said, is whether he planned a first strike or whether the mushrooming conspiracy unfolding in Moscow was to serve as a provocation that would lead both sides to a flash point.

	"I am told that the only case when the two sides were on the verge of war was the Cuban crisis," in 1962, he said. "But I think this was the first case. And this first time that we were on the verge of war was even more dangerous," because the devastation of nuclear weapons was not yet an article of faith.

	Mr. Brent said he believes that fear of a nuclear holocaust could have led Beria and perhaps others at that final dinner to assent to Stalin's death.

	"No question -- they were afraid," he said. "But they knew that the direction Stalin was going in was one of fiercer and fiercer conflict with the U.S. This is what Khrushchev saw, and it is what Beria saw. And it scared them to death."

	The authors say that Stalin knew of his comrades' fears, citing as proof remarks at a December 1952 meeting of top Communist leaders in which Stalin began laying out the scope of the Doctors' Plot and the American threat to Soviet power.

	"Here, look at you -- blind men, kittens," the minutes record Stalin as saying. "You don't see the enemy. What will you do without me?"



&nbsp;


https://books.google.com/books/about/Writings_of_Frank_Marshall_Davis.html
	CHURCHILL OR WALLACE WORLD?: PART II
	September 22, 1943
	Frank Marshall Davis

	...It’s not too early to consider the fate of Japan after her defeat, and whatever plans are made will have to be worked out with the full approval of China as well as Russia, her neighbors, if there’s going to be any kind of real peace. No Anglo-American alliance is going to go in and run Japan in utter disregard of the wishes of the Soviet Union and the Chinese nation without inviting eventual disaster.


https://archive.org/details/TheWorldWasGoingOurWayTheKGBAndTheBattleForTheTheThirdWorld
	The Soviet Union refused to sign the San Francisco peace treaty and condemned the security treaty. Its refusal to give up the four islands in the southern chain of the Kuriles north of Hokkaido (known in Japan as the ‘Northern Territories’), which it had occupied at the end of the war, made it impossible for the remainder of the century to conclude a peace treaty with Japan. A Soviet offer in 1956 to return the two southernmost islands (Shikotan and the Habomais) in return for a peace treaty on its own terms failed to break the deadlock and was later withdrawn.

	Throughout the Cold War one of the main priorities of the Tokyo residency’s active measures was to drive a wedge between Japan and the United States. Its first major opportunity came with the negotiation of a revised security treaty in January 1960. A campaign against ratification of the treaty begun by the Japanese Socialist Party (JSP), the Japanese Communist Party (JCP), the Trades Union General Council (Sohyo) and the Student Federation (Zengakuren) turned into the biggest mass movement in Japanese political history. At the height of the protest in May and June 1960, several million people in Tokyo and the main cities took part in street demonstrations and work stoppages, attended meetings and signed petitions. There were brawls in the Diet and riots in the streets, during which a female Tokyo University student was trampled to death. As usually happened with protest movements of which it approved, the KGB claimed excessive credit for it.

	...The Tokyo residency also made plans for peacetime acts of sabotage intended to damage US-Japanese relations. In Line F jargon each act of sabotage was termed a ‘lily’ (lilya), the explosive device a ‘bouquet’ (buket), the detonator a ‘little flower’ (tsvetok), the explosion of the device a ‘splash’ (zaplyv), and the saboteur the ‘gardener’ (sadovnik). Among the sabotage plans devised by Line F was operation VULKAN, an attack on the library of the American Cultural Center in Tokyo which was planned to coincide with demonstrations against the Vietnam War in October 1965. The illegal agent NOMOTO was to place a book bomb in a bookcase in the library shortly before it closed one evening, together with a detonator concealed in a pack of American cigarettes which was timed to go off in the early hours of the morning. In order to conceal the KGB’s hand in the operation, Service A was to prepare leaflets purporting to come from Japanese nationalist extremists calling for attacks on US property. The most dramatic scheme devised by Line F to cause a major crisis in US- Japanese relations was a 1969 plan to scatter radioactive material in Tokyo Bay in the expectation that it would be blamed on US nuclear submarines using the Yokosuka naval base and cause a national outcry. Though supported by the Tokyo resident, the plan was turned down by the Centre because of the difficulty of obtaining suitable radioactive material from the United States and the danger that the source of Soviet material might be detected. 18 Two years later KGB plans for ‘special actions’ were drastically scaled down after some of them were compromised by the defection in London of the Line F officer, Oleg Lyalin.


&nbsp;


http://www.hawaii.edu/uhwo/clear/HonoluluRecord1/frankblog1950.html
	May 18, 1950: Our New “Democratic” Partner

	Frank Marshall Davis

	I was brought up with a healthy respect for the word, democracy. And yet I have constantly found it used with the utmost cynicism on the home front; this loose usage has undoubtedly prepared the way for careless handling internationally.

	Thus we have the amazing spectacle of the foreign ministers of the United States, Great Britain and France formally, announcing that Western Germany is being brought in as a full fledged partner in the alliance of the "western democracies" against Russia.

	If there had been a sincere effort to democratize Western Germany, I would feel much better about it. But it is a known fact that many honest American officials have quit their posts in disgust over the way in which Western Germany is being handed back to the Nazis.


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	The [Federal Republic of Germany] was a major target for KGB active measures as well as intelligence collection. The chief priority of both KGB and HVA influence operations during the 1950s and 1960s was to discredit as many West German politicians as possible as neo-Nazis and “revenge- seekers.”

	...The most celebrated West German target of the KGB and the HVA was Willy Brandt, codenamed POLYARNIK (“Polar”). From the moment Brandt became Bürgermeister of Berlin in October 1957, he was the victim of a series of active measures operations designed first to discredit and then to blackmail him. Given Brandt’s heroic record of resistance to Hitler, it was plainly unrealistic to include him in the KGB’s list of neo-Nazi conspirators. Instead, by distorting his early career and war record, KGB and HVA active measures sought, at various times, to portray him as a Gestapo informer, an anti-German émigré, a collaborator with SIS and the CIA and even as a former Soviet agent.

	...Brandt quickly denounced the “blind terror” waged by the Communists, on Soviet instructions, against POUM and other left-wing heretics:

		The truth of the matter is: the Comintern is determined to destroy all forces that refuse to obey its orders. It is for this reason that the whole international labor movement must rise against it.

	Brandt in turn was, absurdly, denounced by the Communists as “an agent of Franco” and “a spy of the Gestapo.”

	...After Hitler’s invasion of the Soviet Union in June 1941, Brandt’s attitude to Moscow changed. ...Some, including Brandt, were now willing to cooperate with the Soviet Union to secure the defeat of Hitler.

	...Brandt’s overriding motive was to provide any information to all three members of the Grand Alliance which might contribute to the defeat of Hitler. In the case of the Soviet Union, he calculated accurately that his best channel of communication with Moscow was via the Stockholm residency.

	The first attempt to discredit Brandt after his election as Berlin Bürgermeister in 1957 was a lengthy operation carried out jointly by the KGB and HVA in 1958-9 to use tendentious versions of his wartime record and other fabrications to show him as an agent of British and American intelligence. But, as the file on the operation acknowledges, “This did not produce the desired result, and Brandt’s position as a politician was not undermined.” Wolf next proposed reviving the old slander that Brandt had been a Gestapo agent during his Norwegian exile, but the East German leadership ordered the plan to be aborted due to lack of credible evidence.


http://www.hawaii.edu/uhwo/clear/HonoluluRecord1/frankblog1950.html
	...Our denazification program was one of the big jokes of the 20th century. Apparently, it was offered as a sop to an American public still outraged by the horrors of the mass tortures at Dachau and Buchenwald, of the attempt to exterminate the whole Jewish people.

	But the public has gradually forgotten in five years. And as the memory of these atrocities faded, so did our denazification. Stalin has been built up as a greater menace than Hitler and tears have been shed over the "poor Nazis" who murdered tens of millions of human beings.

	...If Germany is to become our partner, let us insist that she get the cleansing promised but never seriously undertaken.


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	...AMONG DEPARTMENT V’S most ambitious proposals for special actions during 1968 was an operation to distract Western opinion from the suppression of the Prague Spring by sabotaging a major oil pipeline, codenamed ZVENO (“Link”), near the Austrian end of Bodensee Lake, which was believed by the Centre to carry 10 million tons of oil a year between Italy and West Germany. By breaching the pipeline at the point where it crossed the Rhine canal, Department V calculated that it could pollute the Bodensee, and thus contaminate the main source of drinking water on the West German— Austrian frontier. To carry the explosive, the Vienna residency purchased four Western-manufactured 1-liter thermos flasks, as well as ten ballpoint pens—presumably to conceal the detonators. The scapegoats for the environmental disaster caused by the explosion were to be Italian extremists allegedly retaliating for acts of sabotage carried out by South Tyrol terrorists. ZVENO set the pattern for most Department V peacetime special actions: immensely laborious and detailed preparations, followed by a reluctant decision not to go ahead because of the political risks involved—in particular, the possibility that, despite all the precautions taken, the hand of the KGB might somehow be discovered. The operation was postponed several times, kept under review for a number of years and finally abandoned.


&nbsp;


http://www.hawaii.edu/uhwo/clear/HonoluluRecord1/frankblog1950.html
	January 12, 1950: Africa is Next Door

	Frank Marshall Davis

	...The empires of Western Europe are fighting as never before to retain a stranglehold on Africa. It is essential for the success of any war with Russia. Yet freedom for Africa is vital to freedom for all Asia; England, France and The Netherlands can get the wealth and raw materials to carry on warfare against liberation of their Asiatic colonies as long as they can exploit Africa. American Big Business prospers by controlling the imperialist cliques of Western Europe; the Atlantic Pact throws our armed might behind the empires as they attempt to crush independence movements within the colonies. And all of this continuation of virtual slavery is justified under the guise of a holy war to contain "Russian communism."

	...At the same time, the fire of liberation burns brighter among Africans with each success of Asiatic people to obtain self-government—thus further indicating the real closeness of Asia and Africa. And England, France, Belgium and the others are worried. So they bring out the usual cry of communism—sometimes with unexpected results.

	For instance, the 2.000,000 whites who rule South Africa have 147 members of parliament but permit only three for the 8,000,000 Negroes—and these three must be white. Last year the Negroes elected two representatives. Both are Communists. According to the Rev. R. W. Stopford, an educational leader in Africa, the natives are attracted by the fact that Russia has virtually abolished illiteracy and has ended discrimination against [sic] colored peoples.


http://www.latimes.com/world/la-fg-c1-black-russian-americans-20141119-story.html
	In Russia, early African American migrants found the good life

	...Most of the African Americans who came to Russia were seeking a better life, desperate to flee the social inequality and Depression-era hardships that racked America at the time, said Allison Blakely, professor emeritus of history at Boston University who has written a book on the African American immigrants.

	...Their ranks included graduates of historically black colleges such as Tuskegee University in Alabama and Virginia's Hampton Agricultural and Industrial School, later called the Hampton Institute. They were engineers, educators, entertainers, journalists, lawyers. The actor-activist Paul Robeson and poet Langston Hughes were among those travelers captivated by communism.

	The Soviets gave the African Americans red-carpet treatment, including fat paychecks, subsidized housing and free vacations.

	"My father felt the U.S.S.R. treated him better than America," said Tynes-Mensah, a former university chemistry instructor who was born in the Russian town of Krasnodar and now lives mainly in the United States, spending summers in Russia. "He was happy here."

	...Tynes, who was sent to various Soviet republics to teach people how to raise ducks and other waterfowl, became a nationally recognized expert on poultry. Golden helped develop a cotton industry in Uzbekistan. And the African Americans introduced Russians to blues and jazz.

	"They had an impact disproportionate to their numbers because they were there precisely because the Soviet leadership was trying to use them as a symbol of what they were trying to build in terms of a truly democratic society," Blakely said. "They were very much in the public eye."


https://archive.org/details/TheWorldWasGoingOurWayTheKGBAndTheBattleForTheTheThirdWorld
	During the mid- 1920s African and American blacks began to study in Moscow’s secret Comintern-run International Lenin School (MLSh) and Communist University of the Toilers of the East (KUTV). All were given false identities during their time in Moscow and their curriculum, like that of the other students, included training in underground work, espionage and guerrilla warfare. The Comintern leadership, however, had low expectations of all but the South Africans. Like other Soviet leaders, Grigori Zinoviev, the Comintern Chairman, knew little about black Africa. When he came to lecture at the KUTV in 1926, an Ashanti student from the Gold Coast, Bankole Awanoore-Renner, asked him about ‘Comintern’s attitude toward the oppressed nations of Africa’. Zinoviev responded by talking in some detail about the problems of Morocco and Tunisia, but Awanoore-Renner complained that he said nothing about ‘the most oppressed people’ south of the Sahara. Though Zinoviev pleaded lack of information, Awanoore-Renner thought he detected the stench of racism. 

	In September 1932 mounting complaints of racism in Moscow by black African and American students led Comintern’s Executive Committee to appoint an investigative committee. In January 1933 Dmitri Manuilsky, who had succeeded Zinoviev as Comintern chief, came to the University to listen to their complaints, which included a letter complaining of the ‘derogatory portrayal of Negroes in the cultural institutions of the Soviet Union’ as ‘real monkeys’. The signatures included the name ‘James Joken’, the Moscow alias of Jomo Kenyatta, later the first leader of independent Kenya. For Kenyatta, as for many radical African students a generation later, life in the Soviet Union was a disillusioning experience.

	...The Soviet Union’s closest relationships with leaders of other newly independent African states were also short lived. Moscow’s main hopes of extending its influence in sub-Saharan Africa were initially centred on Ghana, which in 1957 became the first black African state to achieve independence under the charismatic leadership of Kwame Nkrumah, widely hailed as the prototype of the new educated African statesman committed to both democracy and socialism. Once in power, however, Nkrumah’s rhetoric of liberation was rapidly contradicted by his intolerance of dissent. Though he claimed to be creating a specifically African brand of socialism rather than subscribing to Marxism-Leninism, his speeches became increasingly pro-Soviet. As he and his sycophantic supporters in the Convention People’s Party (CPP) transformed Ghana into a corrupt one-party state, Soviet and East German military, security and technical advisers arrived in increasing numbers. A KGB-trained National Security Service oversaw a huge network of informers. According to a Ghanaian white paper published after Nkrumah’s overthrow: ‘Nkrumah’s security officers, both men and women, were placed everywhere - in factories, offices, drinking bars, political rallies and even in churches, not forgetting the taxi drivers, bus drivers, shop assistants, peddlers and seemingly unemployed persons who were all acting as informants.’ 

	...The most important lesson drawn by Nkrumah from his overthrow was ‘that independent African states must pursue a policy of all-out socialism if they are to survive’. That his host in Guinea, Sékou Touré, survived in power, however, was due not to ‘all-out socialism’ but to the pervasiveness of his reign of terror which left even the army too cowed to attempt a military coup. The prisoners brought from their homes in the early hours for interrogation at Camp Boiro and other prison camps constructed with assistance from the East German Stasi and the Czechoslovak StB were tortured until they confessed to the usually imaginary conspiracies with which Sékou Touré was obsessed. The KGB turned a blind eye to the horrors of the Guinean regime, preferring instead to exploit its leader’s paranoid tendencies by active measures designed to convince him that the CIA was plotting to overthrow him.


&nbsp;


http://www.hawaii.edu/uhwo/clear/HonoluluRecord1/frankblog1949.html
	September 22, 1949: Cold War In Church

	Frank Marshall Davis

	...If civilization survives the threat of World War III, future generations will remember Dr. Melish as one of the great martyrs of 1949 in the fight against the flood-tide of American fascism. Dr. Melish is a victim, on the religious front, of a Truman administration that talks like an anger and acts like the devil. 

	The cold war policies of the bi-partisans, administered by their thought control police, are aimed against such Negroes as Paul Robeson, who think American democracy could learn about race relations from Russia


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	Among the intelligence which the Childs brothers reported to the FBI for more than twenty years were the claims of the CPUSA leadership to influence on the black civil rights movement. In 1958 Jack Childs had reported a boast by James Jackson, Party secretary in charge of “Negro and Southern Affairs,” that “most secret and guarded people” were “guiding” the civil rights leader Martin Luther King. According to one KGB file, Dobrynin, the Soviet ambassador, later asked Hall to stop bringing Jackson, whom he described as “poorly trained politically,” to meetings with him; he also requested the Soviet mission to the UN (by which he probably meant the KGB New York residency) to break off contact with Jackson.

	There was, however, some substance to the claim that the CPUSA had penetrated King’s entourage. The Childs brothers reported that one of King’s advisers, Stanley D. Levison, a New York lawyer and entrepreneur, was a secret Party member. 77 Levison drafted sections of King’s 1958 book, Stride Toward Freedom, and helped prepare his defense against trumped-up charges of perjury on his Alabama tax returns in 1960. Levison also introduced into King’s entourage a secret black member of the CPUSA, Hunter Pitts “Jack” O’Dell. The FBI, who put Levison under surveillance, reported that he was meeting Viktor Lesiovsky, a KGB officer working as special assistant to the UN Secretary-General, U Thant. It was Levison’s alleged influence on King which in 1963 led Attorney-General Robert Kennedy to authorize the bugging of King’s hotel rooms. Though the bugs produced recordings of a number of King’s sexual liaisons, in which President Lyndon B. Johnson took a prurient interest, they provided no evidence of Communist influence on him.

	...By the mid-1960s the claims by the CPUSA leadership that secret Party members within King’s entourage would be able to “guide” his policies had proved to be hollow. To the Centre’s dismay, King repeatedly linked the aims of the civil rights movement not to the alleged worldwide struggle against American imperialism but to the fulfillment of the American dream and “the magnificent words of the Constitution and the Declaration of Independence.”

	...Having given up hope of influencing King, the Centre aimed instead at replacing him with a more radical and malleable leader. In August 1967 the Centre approved an operational plan by the deputy head of Service A, Yuri Modin, former controller of the Magnificent Five, to discredit King and his chief lieutenants by placing articles in the African press, which could then be reprinted in American newspapers, portraying King as an “Uncle Tom” who was secretly receiving government subsidies to tame the civil rights movement.

	...The same operational plan also contained a series of active measures designed to discredit US policy “on the Negro issue.” The Centre authorized Modin ...To forge and distribute through illegal channels a document showing that the John Birch Society, in conjunction with the Minuteman organization, is developing a plan for the physical elimination of leading figures in the Negro movement in the US.

	...Service A sought to exploit the violent images of the long, hot summers which began in August 1965 with race riots in Watts, the black Los Angeles ghetto, which resulted in thirty-six deaths, left 1,032 injured and caused damage estimated at over 40 million dollars. The Centre seems to have hoped that as violence intensified King would be swept aside by black radicals such as Stokeley Carmichael, who told a meeting of Third World revolutionaries in Cuba in the summer of 1967, “We have a common enemy. Our struggle is to overthrow this system ... We are moving into open guerrilla warfare in the United States.”

	...King’s assassination on April 4, 1968 was quickly followed by the violence and rioting which the KGB had earlier blamed King for trying to prevent. Within a week riots had erupted in over a hundred cities, forty-six people had been killed, 3,500 injured and 20,000 arrested. To “Deke” DeLoach, it seemed that, “The nation was teetering on the brink of anarchy.” Henceforth, instead of dismissing King as an Uncle Tom, Service A portrayed him as a martyr of the black liberation movement and spread conspiracy theories alleging that his murder had been planned by white racists with the connivance of the authorities.

	...Simultaneously the Centre implemented a series of active measures designed to weaken the internal cohesion of the United States and undermine its international reputation by inciting race hatred. In 1971 Andropov personally approved the fabrication of pamphlets full of racist insults purporting to come from the extremist Jewish Defense League, headed by Meir Kahane, calling for a campaign against the “black mongrels” who, it was claimed, were attacking Jews and looting Jewish shops. Thirty pamphlets were mailed to a series of militant black groups in the hope of producing “mass disorders in New York.” At the same time forged letters were sent to sixty black organizations giving fictitious details of atrocities committed by the League against blacks and calling for vengeance against Kahane and his chief lieutenants.

	...On at least one occasion, the Centre ordered the use of explosives to exacerbate racial tensions in New York. On July 25, 1971 the head of the FCD First (North American) Department, Anatoli Tikhonovich Kireyev, instructed the New York residency to proceed with operation PANDORA: the planting of a delayed-action explosive package in “the Negro section of New York.” Kireyev’s preferred target was “one of the Negro colleges.” After the explosion the residency was ordered to make anonymous telephone calls to two or three black organizations, claiming that the explosion was the work of the Jewish Defense League.


https://www.theatlantic.com/international/archive/2013/03/how-stalin-created-some-of-the-post-soviet-worlds-worst-ethnic-conflicts/273649/
	How Stalin Created Some of the Post-Soviet World's Worst Ethnic Conflicts

	Eighty-one-year-old Nikolai Khasig was born in Sukhumi in 1932. It was just one year after Soviet dictator Josef Stalin stripped Abkhazia of its short-lived status as a full-fledged republic of the USSR and made it a region of Soviet Georgia.

	At the end of 1936, Lavrenty Beria -- at that time the head of the Transcaucasia region and later the sadistic head of Stalin's secret police -- invited the popular Abkhaz leader Nestor Lakoba to dinner at his house in Tbilisi. Lakoba died suddenly -- officially, of a heart attack, but it was widely believed that the former revolutionary comrade of Stalin's had been poisoned.

	In the repressions that began in 1937, the entire Abkhaz government was arrested and subjected to show trials. Soviet archives later revealed that Beria had ordered them all executed before the trials even began. Collectivization came to Abkhazia with a vengeance. Soviet publications began arguing that the Abkhaz were actually of Georgian origin in the first place.

	"Such violence, such humiliation, such abuse, such genocide," Khasig recalls. "Our people never experienced such things before."

	..."In 1945, after the end of the war, Abkhaz schools were shut down and the policy of forced assimilation was begun," he says. "Our children -- we ourselves -- studied in the Georgian language and didn't know a single word [of Abkhaz]. We were simply cut off."

	When the Soviet Union collapsed in 1991, all this old resentment and more surged to the surface.

	In 1992, war broke out in Abkhazia -- with Abkhaz separatists joined in their struggle by representatives of other aggrieved Caucasus nations such as Chechens, Circassians, Ossetians, and Cossacks.

	The Abkhaz were also actively supported by the Russian military. An estimated 8,000 people were killed and as many as 240,000 ethnic Georgians were displaced.

	...The guns of war flared elsewhere as well in the former Soviet Union in the early 1990s. And these similar ethnic conflicts, many of which were exacerbated by Soviet polices six decades earlier, have come to be called "Stalin's time bombs."

	Such conflicts, spanning from Central Europe to the intricate patchwork of exclaves that comprises the borders of Central Asia, are in many ways direct legacies of the shifting nationalities policies that were often brutally implemented during the nearly 30 years that Stalin towered over the Soviet Union.

	These disputed places include the disputed ethnic-Armenian region of Azerbaijan called Nagorno-Karabakh, Russia's North Caucasus republic of Chechnya, its neighboring republics, and the breakaway Moldovan region of Transdniester.

	From bizarre border policies and the wholesale deportation of ethnic groups to the mass importation of ethnic Russians to various regions, Stalin's policies created or aggravated conflicts that remain central to understanding Eurasia today. 


https://archive.org/details/TheWorldWasGoingOurWayTheKGBAndTheBattleForTheTheThirdWorld
	After the liberation of Ukraine, he returned with the Institute to Kharkov. His memories of the brutal punishment of many thousands of ‘anti-Soviet’ Ukrainians sometimes gave him nightmares in later life.


http://www.bbc.com/news/world-europe-25058256
	But the pain of the Holodomor comes not only from the unfathomable number of dead. Many people believe the causes were man-made and intentional. A genocide.

	They say that Joseph Stalin wanted to starve into submission the rebellious Ukrainian peasantry and force them into collective farms.

	The Kremlin requisitioned more grain than farmers could provide. When they resisted, brigades of Communist Party activists swept through the villages and took everything that was edible.

	"The brigades took all the wheat, barley - everything - so we had nothing left," says Ms Karpenko. "Even beans that people had set aside just in case.

	"The brigades crawled everywhere and took everything. People had nothing left to do but die."

	Genocide row

	As the hunger mounted, Soviet authorities took extra measures, such as closing off Ukraine's borders, so that peasants could not travel abroad and obtain food. This amounted to a death sentence, experts say.

	"The government did everything it could to prevent peasants from entering other regions and looking for bread," says Oleksandra Monetova, from Kiev's Holodomor Memorial Museum. 

	...Mr Baley, an American composer who was born in Ukraine, supports efforts to have the Holodomor recognised internationally as genocide.

	"You have to admit that it was done, if you want to have any kind of human progress," he says. "You can't wrap it up and say that it wasn't."


&nbsp;


http://www.hawaii.edu/uhwo/clear/HonoluluRecord1/frankblog1949.html
	September 29, 1949: Challenge to the Church

	Frank Marshall Davis

	..."Whatever your differences and mine may be with Soviet Russia, we must recognize the difference between the Communist attack on religion and the fascist attack. The Communist attack is intellectual, philosophical, critical and harmless, practically speaking."


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	...As well as giving higher priority to operations against the Vatican, Andropov also stepped up the persecution of the Ukrainian Uniates. In 1969 the head of the underground church, Bishop Velychkovsky, was arrested and sentenced to three years’ imprisonment. The KGB reported that his arrest “greatly helped to achieve a psychological breakthrough in the mind of SERAFIM,” another leading figure in the Uniate underground, who was recruited as a KGB agent. According to Mitrokhin’s notes on his file:

		SERAFIM explained in detail by whom, when and in what circumstances he was tasked to direct monks illegally; he reported incidents of criminal organizational activity by Bishop Velychkovsky and his close contacts; he reported on the situation among underground orders of monks . . . and he drew up a list of Uniate priests operating illegally. SERAFIM’S answers were recorded covertly on tape.

	Though SERAFIM agreed to “cooperate secretly” with the KGB, he refused to sign the written undertaking required of most informers. His controller did not insist, on the grounds that it would represent too great “a psychological trial for a man of religion” and leave him in fear of “divine punishment in the next world.” Another agent, terrified of “being cast into Hell,” had once begged the controller, on bended knee, to return his signed undertaking.


&nbsp;


https://books.google.com/books/about/Writings_of_Frank_Marshall_Davis.html
	BEN AND THE REDS
	September 17, 1943
	Frank Marshall Davis

	Maybe we ought to get more savvy about the Communists anyway. A social system that can mold Russia from a huge weakling in twenty-five years to what is today the strongest and most united nation in Europe, a people who has borne the full brunt of the terrible Nazi war machine and has flung it back, must have something, fundamentally sound.

	You have probably noticed here at home that practically every social advance made under the Roosevelt regime has been labeled “Red.” You may have noticed also that practically everybody who yells, “Communist” is him-self anti-Negro or anti-labor


http://www.cnn.com/2016/03/30/us/black-privilege/index.html
	...David Horowitz, author of the book, "Black Skin Privilege and the American Dream," says blacks are still more privileged, though they lag behind other racial groups in varying categories. It's not white privilege that's preventing them from doing better, he says; it's their behavior, such as their inability to build more intact families.

	"The fact that white people are better off is not a privilege; it's earned," says Horowitz, founder of the David Horowitz Freedom Center, a think tank in Los Angeles created to combat "the efforts of the radical left and its Islamist allies to destroy American values."


&nbsp;


http://www.hawaii.edu/uhwo/clear/HonoluluRecord1/frankblog1950.html
	April 6, 1950: Bridges Conviction

	Frank Marshall Davis

	I am not at all surprised at the conviction of Harry Bridges. Disappointed, yes, but not surprised. With the political atmosphere prevailing in my country today, I believe that President Truman or even Alfred Sloan of General Motors would be convicted of being Soviet spies if a way could be found to bring them to trial. And if Senator McCarthy keeps up his attacks, even that might happen.

	From the accounts in the local daily press, Judge Harris gave a surprisingly fair charge to the jury. In this, he partially redeemed himself for certain earlier tactics which put the whole defense in a bad light. But by the time the court charged the jury, the real damage had already been done. The one bright spot is that the jurors deliberated from Friday until Tuesday before reaching a verdict. Even the growing roar of the witch-hunters did not intimidate them into a speedy decision of guilt. In calmer times, I believe they would have freed Bridges


https://books.google.com/books?id=8TXhy5pl2A0C&pg=PA224
	In four different federal hearings, Bridges denied under oath that he wa a member of the CPUSA. In the files of the Comintern in Moscow, we found a list of CPUSA members elected to the Central Committee of the party in 1936; on that list is a Comrade Rossi, identified in an accompanying biography as the pseudonym of Harry Bridges.


https://books.google.com/books?id=IB_ShD9fTcsC&pg=PA47
	Another former Communist, Sam Diner, told the FBI that Eisler had acted in concert with Harry Bridges to stir up dock workers in the San Francisco strike of 1934 that paralyed the city.


http://www.sfgate.com/bayarea/article/Soviet-Spies-Cast-a-Wide-Net-in-S-F-Decoded-2973582.php
	Soviet Spies Cast a Wide Net in S.F. / Decoded messages reveal activities of KGB in the '40s

	...The messages, distributed last week by the NSA's Center for Cryptologic History, were coded by Soviet agents and telegraphed from San Francisco, Mexico City, New York and Washington to Moscow and vice versa.

	...Among the illegal activities in the Bay Area that Soviet agents engaged in were kidnapping Russians hiding here and sending them back to the Soviet Union, where they faced certain death; receiving and assisting clandestine Russian agents with faked American identities; spying on American officials; and recruiting Communists in California for intelligence work.

	...Another local figure who appears in the telegraph traffic, although the reference is fragmentary and unclear, is Harry Bridges, the longtime pro-Soviet head of the International Longshoremen's and Warehousemen's Union. 


https://www.wilsoncenter.org/sites/default/files/Venona-San%20Francisco-KGB.pdf
	San Francisco KGB Station -- Moscow Center Cables, 1943-46
	From: SAN FRANCISCO
	To: MOSCOW

	...Harry BRIDGES asked...

	...and William MACKEY[MAKKEJ], who is working on the loading of our  ships in PORTLAND under “UNCLE[DYaDYa].  [1 group unrecovered] “VITALIJ”[v]  for processing [OFORMLENIE] these people...


https://books.google.com/books?id=BabHjAEzkdwC&pg=PA311	
	By Frank Marshall Davis

	...I also wrote to Harry Bridges, head of the ILWU, whom I had met at Lincoln School. He suggested I get in touch with Koji Ariyoshi, editor of the Honoulu Record, a newspaper that was generally similar to the Chicago Star.


https://books.google.com/books?id=ZqtEIBxAhMsC&pg=PA177
	...Davis was the editor until 1948 ...The editorial column "Frank-ly Speaking" began at The Chicago Star. The aim of this publication was to heal the rift between various groups and promote a policy of cooperation and unity between Russia and the United States.


&nbsp;


http://www.hawaii.edu/uhwo/clear/HonoluluRecord1/frankblog1950.html
	June 15, 1950: The Master Plot

	Frank Marshall Davis

	...The New York trials of the 11 Communist leaders, the Harry Bridges trial, the contempt action against the Hawaii 36 are but steps in a definite program which could mean jail within two years for those who dare to read progressive publications, and this includes the HONOLULU RECORD. The plotters are banking on the continued disinterest of the American public in their master drive to kill off all independent and progressive thought within our nation.

	It is a matter of public record that on Thursday, January 12, this year, one Raymond P. Whearty, acting assistant attorney general, revealed to the House Subcommittee on Appropriations that the Department of Justice is planning the arrest and trial of 21,105 persons who — now get this — appear to be acting in concert with Russian interests." This program, Whearty said, is expected to "come up about the fiscal year 1951."

	...To Get Non-Conformists

	"The bulk of the cases involve subversive activity as applied to individuals or organizations. By that I mean persons who are active members of the Communist party and similar organizations, or who appear to be acting in concert with Russian interests." 

	This should be plain enough for all to see. By the justice department's own admission, they are not after Communists only but anybody who happens to object to the policies at the moment of those in power. That would mean anybody who spoke for peace or who opposed the Atlantic Pact or who asked for a raise in pay. This could be interpreted as "appearing to act in concert with Russian interests." They plan to do this even without the passage of the Mundt-Ferguson bill.

	And if they can make charges stick against the 21,105 victims, then they will mop up on anybody else who has not been intimidated and who insists on the traditional right to express an opinion contrary to those sanctioned by the thought police. In other words, you! This timetable for American fascism can be destroyed if the people throw off their indifference and decide they will permit no further infringement upon their democratic rights as Americans. Let the people speak!


http://www.businessinsider.com/here-was-the-fbis-secret-plan-in-case-nuclear-war-broke-out-2015-1
	The United States government made extreme, top-secret plans for preserving national security in the event of a nuclear attack during the Cold War, according to documents recently released to transparency journalism organization MuckRock.
 
	The FBI created "Plan C" in 1956, the same year the Red Army shut down the Hungarian Revolution, and if activated, Plan C would have put the nation under martial law and allowed for nearly 13,000 people to be detained for having links to "subversive organizations."
 
	The FBI held a briefing with three top officials from every department to distribute papers outlining Plan C, which was later given to FBI field offices. The plan was ordered to be destroyed in July 1957.
 
	Although the plan was never released, MuckRock's memos from closed meetings with high-ranking officials give readers an idea of what could have happened. Plan C would have gone into effect "after a war has begun in which the U.S. is involved or may become involved and prior to an actual attack on the U.S. itself," according to the documents.
 
	Government organizations would decide which of their employees were essential and have them hide out in backup offices. Soviet embassies would be searched for weapons, radios and explosives. Up to 900 Soviet diplomats and couriers would be taken into custody.
 
	In an emergency, the government would also have activated a detention program that would have led to arrests for "individuals whose affiliations with subversive organizations are so pronounced that their continued liberty in the event of national emergency would present a serious threat," according to the documents.


https://spectator.org/34799_dreams-frank-marshall-davis/
	...the FBI placed [Frank Marshall Davis] on the federal government’s Security Index, which meant that he could be immediately detained or arrested in the event of a national emergency, such as a war between the United States and USSR.


Davis used his talent for writing to help cover for the Soviet's crimes. He consistently advocated Soviet foreign policy over American foreign policy, and painted Russia as a superior country to his own. At the same time, many of the people who Davis associated with were affiliated with Soviet intelligence, and what is known about his Communist Party activities seemed awfully close to espionage:


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	Zarubin’s recruitment strategy was simple and straightforward. He demanded that the leaders of the Communist Party of the United States (CPUSA) identify supporters and sympathizers in government establishments suitable for work as agents. When Zarubin arrived in New York, the CPUSA leader Earl Browder (codenamed RULEVOY—“Helmsman”) was serving a prison sentence for using a false passport during his frequent secret journeys to the Soviet Union. His first contact was therefore with Eugene Dennis (born Francis X. Waldron, codenamed RYAN), a Moscow-trained Comintern agent who later succeeded Browder as CPUSA general secretary. Dennis reported that a number of Communists (mostly secret Party members) were joining the first professional American foreign intelligence agency, the Office of the Coordinator of Information, reorganized in June 1942 as the Office of Strategic Services (OSS). Shortly before the foundation of OSS, Browder left prison to resume the Party leadership. He was, Dennis told Moscow, “in a splendid mood.”

	Among the first Soviet agents to penetrate OSS was Duncan Chaplin Lee (codenamed KOCH), who became personal assistant to its head, General “Wild Bill” Donovan. Donovan had a relaxed attitude to the recruitment of Communists. “I’d put Stalin on the OSS payroll,” he once said, “if I thought it would help us defeat Hitler.” Throughout the Second World War the NKVD knew vastly more about OSS than OSS knew about the NKVD.

	Browder’s recruitment leads also included foreign Communists and fellow travelers who had taken refuge in the United States.


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20001#page/n11/mode/2up
	...According to [REDACTED], [FRANK MARSHALL DAVIS] was working with [REDACTED] in obtaining recruits for the Communist Party among International Workers Order members


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	...Though most of his sources must have been aware of the ultimate destination of their intelligence, the network was run under what Akhmerov termed “the Communist Party flag.” Informants regarded themselves as helping the CPUSA, which would in turn assist its Soviet comrades.


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20004#page/n41/mode/2up
	Mr. DAVIS has signed a number of statements in behalf of Communists under the sponsorship of the Civil Rights Congress. One of these defended was GERHART EISLER, notorious Communist international agent who escaped jailing for passport fraud by fleeing to the Soviet sector of Germany.


http://spartacus-educational.com/Gerhart_Eisler.htm
	...Gerhart Eisler eventually got a new job at the Soviet embassy in Berlin. His official job was as a political analyst but he had actually been recruited as a spy.

	...Joseph Stalin ordered Eisler to Moscow...


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	...The CPUSA’s assistance in the operation to assassinate Trotsky, combined with the enthusiasm with which it “exposed and weeded out spies and traitors,” appeared to make its underground section a reliable recruiting ground.

	Vasili Zarubin’s regular contacts with the CPUSA leader, Earl Browder, plainly convinced him of the reliability of those covert Party members who agreed to provide secret intelligence.


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20004#page/n13/mode/2up
	[REDACTED] stated that they also discussed deportation proceedings against Mrs. EARL BROWDER and DAVIS agreed to write a letter to President ROOSEVELT on behalf of Mrs. BROWDER. EARL BROWDER, husband of Mrs. BROWDER, was former general secretary of the Communist Party in the United States until 1945.


http://spartacus-educational.com/USAbrowder.htm
	"Browder had been an eager and productive participant in a range of Soviet espionage efforts during the 1930s... recruiting from his 'open' Communist cadres a significant number of those who later became prominent NKVD agents and sources within the American government." Browder's second wife, Raissa Berkman, was also an agent." 


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20001#page/n11/mode/2up
	In his letter to President ROOSEVELT, DAVIS was quoted as saying the following:

		"Because I am also a member of the minority group, I cannot help but feel the injustice of the persecution heaped by Attorney General BIDDLE on Mrs. EARL BROWDER, who faces deportation because of a mere technicality.

		"Mrs. BROWDER committed no crime. She is not a dangerous alien. There is no evidence she has ever actively participated in American politics. She is the mother of three children, who are at least as American as any other.

		"But she is the wife of the General Secretary of the Communist Party. This means she is married to a man who places winning the war against Fascism and complete unity among all people above any and all considerations. Does this, therefore, make Mrs. BROWDER unfit to live in our great nation?"


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20004#page/n13/mode/2up
	In June, 1966, Confidential Informant [REDACTED] stated that FRANK MARSHALL DAVIS was one of numerous guests to be invited to a cocktail party for EARL BROWDER in the apartment of [REDACTED] Chicago in the near future. 


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	By the spring of 1943, however, the Centre was worried about the security of its large and expanding American agent network. Zarubin became increasingly incautious both in his meetings with Party leaders and in arranging for the payment to them of secret subsidies from Moscow. One of the files noted by Mitrokhin records censoriously, “Without the approval of the Central Committee, Zarubin crudely violated the rules of clandestinity.”.


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20002#page/n37/mode/2up
	[REDACTED], in an attempt to interest an informant in joining the Communist Party, told him that if he ever needed any money to get in touch with FRANK MARSHALL DAVIS. [REDACTED] said DAVIS has financially helped him and others.


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20004#page/n41/mode/2up
	[REDACTED], a former linotype operator for the Honolulu Record Publishing Company, Ltd, from 1949 to August 1953, advised SA's HAROLD L. CHILD, Jr., and the writer on September 9, 1953, that he was acquainted with [FRANK MARSHALL DAVIS] since the early 1930's when subject was editor of the "Atlanta Daily" at Atlanta, Georgia. he stated he later met subject in Honolulu and was rather surprised to find that subject had remarried and was living in rather luxurious fashion in contrast to his early modest existence. Subject confidentially informed him that his wife, [REDCTED] had [REDACTED] and was to [REDACTED] representing the [REDACTED] in 1954 when she reaches the age of thirty.


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	On one occasion Browder asked Zarubin to deliver Soviet money personally to the Communist underground organization in Chicago; the implication in the KGB file is that he agreed. On another occasion, in April 1943, Zarubin traveled to California for a secret meeting with Steve Nelson, who ran a secret control commission to seek out informants and spies in the Californian branch of the Communist Party, but failed to find Nelson’s home. Only on a second visit did he succeed in delivering the money. On this occasion, however, the meeting was bugged by the FBI which had placed listening devices in Nelson’s home.


http://spartacus-educational.com/Gerhart_Eisler.htm
	Arrest of Gerhart Eisler 

	...Real interest in Eisler had picked up in 1943 as a result of another, entirely separate investigation in which the FBI overheard important conversations in San Francisco between an American Communist and a Soviet vice-consul. Steve Nelson, the American, told Soviet Vice-Consul Gregory Kheiffets about his efforts to recruit scientists at the Manhattan Project, and also spoke of the dissolution of the Comintern.


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20004#page/n41/mode/2up
	...[DAVIS] was listed by the magazine 'PM' as a signatory to a petition ... calling upon President TRUMAN to effect the immediate release of Communist GERHEART EISLER.


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	The Soviet ambassador in Washington was told confidentially by none other than Roosevelt’s adviser, Harry Hopkins, that a member of his embassy had been detected passing money to a Communist in California.

	...Though Zarubin became somewhat more discreet after this “friendly warning,” his cover had been blown. Worse was yet to come. Four months later Zarubin was secretly denounced to the FBI by Vasili Mironov, a senior officer in the New York residency who had earlier appealed unsuccessfully to the Centre for Zarubin’s recall. 5 In an extraordinary anonymous letter to Hoover on August 7, 1943, Mironov identified Zarubin and ten other leading members of residencies operating under diplomatic cover in the United States, himself included, as Soviet intelligence officers. He also revealed that Browder was closely involved with Soviet espionage and identified the Hollywood producer Boris Morros (FROST) as a Soviet agent. Mironov’s motives derived partly from personal loathing for Zarubin himself. He told Hoover, speaking of himself in the third person, that Zarubin and Mironov “both hate each other.” Mironov also appears to have been tortured by a sense of guilt for his part in the NKVD’s massacre of the Polish officer corps in 1940. Zarubin, he told Hoover, “interrogated and shot Poles in Kozelsk, Mironov in Starobelsk.”

	...With his cover blown, however, Zarubin found life in Washington difficult. One of his most humiliating moments came at a dinner for members of the Soviet embassy given early in 1944 by the governor of Louisiana, Sam Houston Jones. After dinner, as guests wandered round the governor’s house in small groups, a lady who appeared to know that Zarubin was a senior NKGB officer, turned to him and said, “Have a seat, General!” Zarubin, whose fuse and sense of humor were both somewhat short, took the seat but replied stiffly, “I am not a general!” Another guest, who identified himself as an officer in military intelligence, complimented the lady on her inside knowledge. He then caused Zarubin further embarrassment by asking for his views on the massacre of 16,000 Polish officers, some of whose bodies had been exhumed in the Katyn woods. Zarubin replied that German allegations that the officers had been shot by the NKVD (as indeed they had) were a provocation intended to sow dissension within the Grand Alliance which would deceive only the naive.

	Zarubin subsequently sought to persuade the Centre that his humiliating loss of cover was due not to his own indiscretion but to the fact that the Americans had somehow discovered that he had interrogated imprisoned Polish officers in Kozelsk. The Centre was unimpressed.


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	...THE REMOVAL FROM power by 1948 of all those Western Communist parties which had taken part in post- war coalitions reduced, but did not end, their ability to assist Soviet intelligence penetration of government bureaucracies. By far the biggest disappointment experienced by the Centre at the beginning of the Cold War in its relations with fraternal parties in the West, however, was the dramatic decline in the assistance offered by the Communist Party of the United States (CPUSA). From the mid-1930s to the onset of the Cold War, Communism had been a major force in the American labor movement, a significant influence on the liberal wing of the Democratic Party and a rite of passage for several hundred thousand young radicals. During the Second World War the Party had played an important part in assisting Soviet penetration of the Roosevelt administration, the MANHATTAN project and the intelligence community. The onset of the Cold War, however, dealt the CPUSA a blow from which it never fully recovered.

	In 1949 Gene Dennis, the general secretary, and ten other Party leaders were put on trial for advocating the forcible overthrow of the federal government. Dennis and nine of the defendants were sentenced to five years in jail, the eleventh was jailed for three years and all the defense attorneys were found in contempt of court. After the Supreme Court upheld the sentences in 1951, more than a hundred other leading Communists were convicted on similar charges. For most of the 1950s the Party was forced into a largely underground existence.


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20004#page/n35/mode/2up
	"I, [REDACTED], am going to make the following voluntary statement to LEO S. BRENNEISEN, known to me as a Special Agent of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. I am willing to appear in court and testify to the following facts to be cross-examined by Counsel and faced by FRANK MARSHALL DAVIS.

	"I believe it was in 1949 in Honolulu, T. H. when I first met FRANK MARSHALL DAVIS at a social function sponsored by the Hawaii Civil Liberties Committee. I had previously joined the Communist Party in San Francisco in 1946 and transferred my membership in January, 1947 to the Communist Party of Hawaii. In 1950 after the Communist Party had conducted a series of control interviews, [REDACTED], known to me as a Communist Party Organizer, told me that the Party was being reorganized and was going underground. [REDACTED] explained to me that the Party was being broken down into "Groups of 3's" and that I was being made chairman of Group #6 and in addition given the assignment of being contact man for my own group and four other groups. [REDACTED] advised me that Chairman of Group #10 was FRANK MARSHALL DAVIS and I was to contact him at DAVIS' office, then maintained in a building of the Crown Transfer Company in the Damon Tract near the Airport.

	"Later in the fall of 1950, I started contacting FRANK MARSHALL DAVIS in connection with Communist Party matters, and relaying to him information received from my superior contact in he Communist Party, either [REDACTED] or [REDACTED].

	"During a portion of 1950, 1951, and part of 1952, I continued contacting FRANK MARSHALL DAVIS and also transmitted dues for the Communist Party received from him to my contact above. During the period of my contact with FRANK MARSHALL DAVIS, he advised me that his wife, [REDACTED], was a member of Group #10. I was never advised of the identity of a third of that group, or the fact that there was a third member in the group. During a portion of 1951, [REDACteD] took over contacts with the DAVIS group but I resumed contacting DAVIS in 1952 and continued meeting him on Communist Party matters until I left the Party in June of that year.


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	...It was deeply ironic that when McCarthyism was at its height the CPUSA was among those Western parties which were least able to give assistance to Soviet espionage. Not till the Supreme Court backed away from its earlier decision in 1957 was the CPUSA able to regroup. By the time the Party had drawn up a new membership list in 1958, there were only 3,000 open members and a much smaller number of undeclared members left.

	...The normal procedure was for the Centre to send a coded message to a CPUSA radio operator in New York containing details of the next transmission of funds. The message would then be passed to Jack Childs, who would decode it and inform his brother, Gus Hall (leader of the CPUSA from 1959 and codenamed PALM), or Hall’s wife Elizabeth that the next delivery was imminent.

	From 1968 the CPUSA radio operator who passed messages from the Centre on to Jack Childs was another undeclared party member of Russian descent, Albert Friedman, codenamed FORD, who worked as a salesman in a Manhattan radio store on East 49th Street. Using the alias Weber, Friedman had worked between the wars at Comintern’s radio school in Moscow, training other underground radio operators. In January 1969 he travelled to Moscow for further training, but performed so well that his instructor told him, “You know more than I do” and invited him to lunch. Though Friedman paid Party dues, his membership of the CPUSA was known only to the KGB and a small group within the Party leadership. What neither the KGB nor CPUSA leaders knew, however, was that since the end of the Second World War Friedman had been an FBI agent in the Party, codenamed CLIP. He passed every word of the Centre’s communications on to the Bureau.


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20011#page/n9/mode/2up
	On July 16, 1956, Confidential Informant [REDACTED], contact with whom has not been sufficient to determine his reliability  but who has admitted membership in the Communist Party from the early 1940's to 1950 or 1951, reported that he was acquainted with DAVIS. [REDACTED] advised he knew of no recent Communist Party activity on the part of DAVIS and was of the opinion the Communist Party In Hawaii was dead. 

	On November 1, 1956, Confidential Informant [REDACTED], who has furnished reliable information in the past, reported he knew of no Communist Party activity on the part of DAVIS in recent months other than his writings in the "Honolulu Record". 

	It is to be noted that the "National Guardian", published weekly by the Weekly Guardian Associates, Inc., New York City, New York, dated October 1, 1956, on page 9 carried a statement by EUGENE DENNIS, CP USA functionary, to the effect that the U. S. Communist Party had no members In Hawaii or Alaska unless they be someone there on vacation.


https://archive.org/stream/FrankMarshallDavisFBIFile/Frank%20Marshall%20Davis%20011_djvu.txt
	...November 27, 1957

	...Informant, who has been familiar with some phases of Communist Party front activity, reported he had no information of any recent Communist Party or Communist Party front activity on the part of subject; however, informant related that he does not believe DAVIS has changed any of his basic political concepts.

	Informant pointed out that in a conversation with DAVIS during the first week of November he had pointed out to DAVIS Khrushchev's statement appearing in local newspapers to the effect that the United States would be crushed in the event of war with Russia. Informant stated that DAVIS declared that Russia wants peace, but when he questioned him as to how he could account for Russia's effort to plaint seeds of dissension in non-Communist countries, DAVIS remarked that Russia feels from experience that socialism is the best way of life for people and that she will, therefore, do everything to help bring it about wherever possible. Informant stated that during this conversation DAVIS answered him in the affirmative when he questioned him if he believed in the dictatorship of the proletariat. Informant related that he pointed out that such a theory had not worked out in Russia but dictatorship had resulted. DAVIS answered by stating that socialism cannot be expected to take the same form in every country, but that the customs and traditions of each country must be considered. DAVIS went on to declare that whatever form it did take in this country, the socialist countries would be standing by to assist. 


It's important to understand that many members of Soviet intelligence didn't actually believe in communism, particularly their leadership. The brutality of the Lenin and Stalin regimes and the deliberate famines in China and Ukraine are evidence of this--if the Soviet's principle interest was for Communism to succeed abroad, it's hard to justify what amounted to deliberate sabotage of Communism at home. Accordingly, there was a wave of Russian spies and propagandists who "renounced" Communism starting in the 1950's and intensifying in the Reagan era--including [Whittaker Chambers](https://books.google.com/books?id=wVndU5P4V-8C&pg=PT163&lpg=PT163), [Hede Massing](https://books.google.com/books?id=g3LtFS3rl9MC&pg=PA241), [Samuel Dickstein](https://cityroom.blogs.nytimes.com/2013/05/22/a-street-named-for-a-soviet-spy-goes-largely-unnoticed/), [David Horowitz](https://www.marxists.org/history/etol/newspape/isr/vol28/no04/horowitz.htm), [Michael Savage](https://web.archive.org/web/20030801234541/http://www.bayarea.com/mld/mercurynews/entertainment/television/6336570.htm), [Viktor Orban](http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/worldnews/europe/hungary/11499564/Viktor-Orban-denies-being-communist-informer-during-days-of-one-party-state-in-Hungary.html), and [James Burnham](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/James_Burnham)--many of whom went on to echo the kind of Russian propaganda we are familiar with today.

It's no surprise then that Soviet intelligence so blatantly used organizations like the CPUSA as a front for espionage activities, even as these activities gradually discredited the Party and Communism more broadly. Just as the Tsarist Okhrana exploited anarchism to destabilize the countries they opposed, Communism served Soviet intelligence as an excuse for violent revolutions and a cover for espionage--a means to an end rather than the end itself.

An impressive number of organizations who's reputations would ostensibly be important--even sacred--to Soviet citizens were likewise exploited by Soviet intelligence for espionage purposes. There's probably no greater example of this than their infiltration of Soviet churches and churches around the world:


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	THE PENETRATION AND PERSECUTION OF THE SOVIET CHURCHES

	...During the 1930s most priests were condemned to a gulag from which few returned. Most churches, with their religious symbols removed or defaced but their onion domes usually left more or less intact, were turned into barns, cinemas and garages, or given over to other secular purposes. After two decades of brutal persecution which had left only a few hundred churches open for worship, the Russian Orthodox Church was unexpectedly revived as a public institution by Stalin’s need for its support during the Great Patriotic War. In 1943, after a gap of seventeen years, the Moscow Patriarchate, the Church’s administrative center, was formally reestablished. During the remainder of the decade, Orthodox Christians reclaimed and lovingly restored several thousand of their churches.

	The Church, however, paid a heavy price for its restoration. The Council for the Affairs of the Russian Orthodox Church (later the Council for Religious Affairs) worked in close cooperation with the NKVD and its successors to ensure the subservience of Church to State. Both Patriarch Aleksi I and Metropolitan Nikolai of Krutitsky and Kolomna, second in the Orthodox hierarchy, joined the World Peace Council, the Soviet front organization founded in 1949, and were highly valued by the KGB as agents of influence. Aleksi declared in 1955:

		The Russian Orthodox Church supports the totally peaceful foreign policy of our government, not because the Church allegedly lacks freedom, but because Soviet policy is just and corresponds to the Christian ideals which the Church preaches.

	The Orthodox Church also took a prominent part in the founding of another front organization, the Christian Peace Conference (CPC), established in 1958 with its headquarters in Prague, in a further attempt to mobilize worldwide Christian support for the “peace policies” of the Soviet Union. At the second conference of the CPC in 1960 delegates from the rest of the world, mostly innocent of its orchestration by Moscow, outnumbered those from the Soviet Bloc.

	In 1961, with the KGB’s blessing, the Orthodox Church joined the World Council of Churches (WCC). At that very moment Khrushchev was in the midst of a ferocious anti-religious campaign which closed down many of the reopened churches, monasteries and seminaries and disbanded half the Orthodox parishes. The KGB was simultaneously seeking to strengthen its grip on the churches which remained. According to a secret KGB directive of 1961: 

		Up to 600 individuals are studying in the two ecclesiastical academies of the Moscow Patriarchate and the five ecclesiastical seminaries. These must be exploited in the interests of the KGB. We must infiltrate our people among the students of these ecclesiastical training establishments so that they will subsequently influence the state of affairs within the Russian Orthodox Church and exert influence on the believers.

	The head of the Second Chief Directorate, General Oleg Mikhailovich Gribanov, reported in 1962 that over the previous two years the KGB had infiltrated “reliable agents” into the leading positions of the Moscow Patriarchate, the Catholic dioceses, the Armenian Gregorian Church and other religious groups. These, he predicted, would make it possible to remove remaining “reactionary Church and sectarian authorities” from their posts.

	...Looking back on his career in the KGB, Oleg Kalugin concludes that, like “the stranglehold over the Church inside the Soviet Union,” the penetration and exploitation of the Russian Orthodox Church abroad was “one of the most sordid and little known chapters in the history of our organization.” Mitrokhin came to the same conclusion, commenting at one point in his notes that the files contained “a whirlpool of filth. The KGB used its agents among Russian Orthodox clergy in the West not merely to spy on emigre communities but also to identify possible agent recruits.


https://vault.fbi.gov/rosenberg-case/rosenberg-sobell-committe/rosenber-sobell-committee-part-1
	FIRST UNITARIAN CHURCH OF LOS ANGELES

	A source advised on May 11, 1964, that the premises of the First Unitarian Church of Los Angeles have been utilized for meetings by Communist Party members and sympathizers over a period of years. Speakers and lecturers at the church frequently espouse Communist causes or, follow the Communist Party line. Communist front group literature is distributed at the church. The church is used by some Communist Party members for "mass concentration" Work. This same infiltration extends to adjuncts of the church such as the Unitarian Public Forum and the Unitarian Universalist Fellowship for Social Justice. STEPHEN H. FRITCHMAN has been minister of the church since 1918. Reverend STEPHEN H. FRITCHMAN is described in the Fourth Report, Un-American Activities Committee in California, 1948, page 115, as a very active "Communist fronter" and connected with numerous "Communist front organizations and activities." Membership in the First Unitarian Church does not of itself connote membership in or sympathy with the Communist Party.


https://books.google.com/books?id=qCAVQ_cdomcC&pg=PA214
	Henry Ware's name never surfaced publicly during the investigations into Soviet espionage. Even though the FBI briefly investigated him, he escaped intense surveillance and personal or professional problems. He had been, however, a useful KGB source for a period.

	...A 1948 KGB memo on Ware stated: "In '35, he was recruited by the OO NKVD USSR to cover the American colony in the Soviet Union." The OO NKVD was the "special department" of the NKVD (predecessor to the KGB) that conducted internal counterintelligence. In other words, Ware was an informant reporting on fellow Americans in Moscow.

	...A founder of the Fairfax Unitarian Universalist Church, president of the Friends of the Library, and an adviser to the Boy Scouts, he died in 1999.


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	...Though the Russian Orthodox Church in north America was split, the faction which remained loyal to the Moscow Patriarchate was, according to Kalugin, “riddled with KGB agents. Among the agents identified in the files noted by Mitrokhin was a cleric codenamed PETROV, who was sent to north America in the 1970s. His case officers in north America contacted him by using the passwords “Pyotr Mikhailovich,” the first name and patronymic of his Fifth Directorate controller in Moscow.

	The file on Arkadi Rodyonovich Tyshchuk (VORONOV), a priest who was posted to the Nikolsky Russian Orthodox cathedral in New York from 1977 to 1982, contains evidence of a hostility to the United States which may also have helped to motivate other Orthodox priests in the KGB’s north American network. The United States, VORONOV told his KGB case officer, suffered from the sin of pride — “and pride comes before a fall:”

		When a country declares itself to be the most powerful and the richest, and that its government is the smartest and possesses the best weapons — that is not maturity, it is bragging, and is the reason for the downfall of all the powerful nations of the past.

	VORONOV usually met his controller from the New York residency either at the Soviet mission to the United Nations, where he went to collect his correspondence from Russia, or on board the ship Mikhail Lermontov, which regularly came into port at New York. More difficult to explain than his hostility to the United States was his apparent admiration for the KGB which, according to his file, he bizarrely described as a “good shepherd” and a “true Russian spiritual guardian and shepherd.

	Russian Orthodox priests in the West were also used by FCD Directorate S to collect material for use in devising the well-documented legends of KGB illegals. In the early 1970s, for example, two KGB agents in the Moscow Patriarchate were sent to carry out detailed research on parish registers in Canada. Ivan Grigoryevich Borcha (codenamed FYODOR), who worked as a priest in prairie parishes of Ukrainian and Romanian communities, studied registers in Alberta and Saskatchewan. Viktor Sergeyevich Petlyuchenko (PATRIOT), who was assigned to Orthodox parishes in Edmonton, carried out further research in Alberta.


https://books.google.com/books?id=IB_ShD9fTcsC&pg=PA57
	A man from the Unitarian Church's worldwide organization came to see me about one of their employees in Europe, Hede Massing's recruit Noel Field. I told him I wasn't permitted to say anything about Field, since the matter was under investigation, but I suggested that the day would come when the church would not want to have Field associated with its endeavors.


http://spartacus-educational.com/Noel_Field.htm
	As Harvey Klehr and John Earl Haynes, Venona: Decoding Soviet Espionage in America (2000) have pointed out: " Field was not new to Soviet and Communist clandestine work. 

	...In 1941 Field became director of the American Unitarian Universalist Service Committee's relief mission in Marseilles. In this role he helped Jewish refugees to escape to Switzerland.

	...Noel Field now became a relief worker, handling Eastern European refugees for the Unitarian Universalist Service Committee (UUSC). It soon became clear that Field was only interested in helping pro-Russian refugees. His superiors protested by cable. "Charity in present day Europe," answered Field, "cannot be neutral. Never have I had so clear a conscience.. and such a harmonious feeling of concord between my convictions and my obligations to suffering mankind."


The Soviets would re-purpose the churches they controlled as fronts for recruiting, supporting their agents, and polishing the false-identities of their "illegals," deep-cover spies. The Soviets were famous for, and perhaps unique in their use of thousands of illegals abroad, each marrying, having children, getting a job, and buying a home in seemingly normal lives parallel to their espionage duties. A 

front organization would need to seem like something a normal American would go to -- so church, youth group, etc.

useful cover for certain things--meeting of spies becomes friend meeting at church, mission to foreign country becomes a youth group or church activity, recurting somone becomes winning over convert to church, that kind of thing

church, political organization probably more of an effective cover politically than to fool authorities--FBI might know a church is a communist front, but what would be political fallout of FBI infiltrating a church?

soviet agents also need a sense of community? got impression the whole of Mercer island was like that--a community for spies (or at least had a lot of organizations like that, not like everyone there a spy). The KGB would want their agents spending their time with each other and making friends with other agents and not other people in the target country, so they don't end up "assimilating" or defecting.




https://esuc.org/about-us/our-stories/
	History of East Shore

	...From the beginning, East Shore members were determined to learn about and affect the world around them. Well-publicized debates and forums on such controversial subjects as the admission of “Red China” to the United Nations earned the new church the name, “The Little Red Church on the Hill”.

	...In September, 1981, Dr. Leon Hopper left his position as Director for Ministerial Education of the Unitarian Universalist Association in Boston to become East Shore’s fourth senior minister. Each minister had brought a different style and different strengths to the growing congregation, and Dr. Hopper began pulling all the strands together by encouraging the members to determine East Shore’s mission, its goals, and the steps to reach those goals.


http://www.freedomtoquestion.org/supplemental_materials/2003_ga_youth_leadership_panel.htm
	Speaker: Leon Hopper

	I was active in the American Unitarian Youth from 1946 to 1952, serving two years as president of the AUY.

	...It is not difficult for me to say that my life has been shaped and formed by my experience in this denomination's youth organization. I would not have entered the ministry had it not been for the AUY and my experience in it. I would not have learned about organizations, community development, social outreach, personal leadership, had it not been for the experiences that I had had in our denomination's youth movement.


https://books.google.com/books?id=OqSKTwsSk6AC&pg=PA71&lpg=PA71
	American Unitarian Youth's affiliation with the World Federation of Democratic Youth met with a challenge at the 1947 AUY convention. ...A strong minority had opposed affiliation at the previous year's convention, citing WFDY's communist participants.

	...A last straw for many AUY leaders had been the purging of the only noncommunist member of WFDY's Secretariat. AUY wrote a letter condemning the move. By the time the affiliation question came to the 1948 annual meeting in Oklahoma for a vote, AUY, UYF, and the American Youth for a Free World were the only American affiliates WFDY had left.

	...the convention voted to disaffiliate. AUY Council members Pete Riable, Leon Hopper, Kurt Hanslow, and Louise Gartner were among those appointed to a committee for writing up a statement explaining the decision.

	...The Unitarian Service Committee was caught up in a communist controversy of its own, and many churches and denominations were touched by the beginnings of what would develop into the witch hunts of the McCarthy era.


http://www.freedomtoquestion.org/supplemental_materials/2003_ga_youth_leadership_panel.htm
	Speaker: Leon Hopper

	...one of the other features that to me that was very important was our sense of global outreach in the youth movement. When I went to my first convention, the discussion was permeated with the question of whether the AUY could continue to participate in the World Federation of Democratic Youth, or whether we should withdraw from an organization that was supposedly a Communist front


https://www.bellingcat.com/news/uk-and-europe/2017/04/27/russia-seeks-influence-european-politics-working-youth-wings-far-right-far-left-parties/
	...In February 2016 Sergey Pospelov, a former head of the state-run Russian youth organisation, Rossmolodezh was at a meeting with Nicolas Papademetriou, president of the “World Federation of Democratic Youth”. The WFDY has been described as a continuation of the Soviet-era Young Communist International, which was affiliated with Comintern. In the mid 20th century WFDY was headed by Alexander Shelepin, who subsequently became the head of the KGB.


http://fau.digital.flvc.org/islandora/object/fau%3A5031/datastream/OBJ/view/The_background_of_the_7th_World_Youth_Festival__Vienna__Austria__July_26-August_4__1959__report_.pdf
	Organizers of the Festivals: The International Union of Students and the World Federation of Democratic Youth

	Of the many techniques which international Communism has employed since the Second World War, one of the most effective has been the organization of Communist "front" groups, so called because they solicit mass membership with constructive programs, but actually "front" for Soviet propaganda. In many cases, these front groups are also used as centers for recruitment and training of young leaders, for espionage, and even for revolutionary resistance to existing governments. Some, like the World Peace Council, encompass a wide range of group interests. Others, like the World Federation of Trade Unions or the International Organization of Journalists, have a particular target for their appeals. The International Union of Students (IUS) and the World Federation of Democratic Youth (WFDY) belong to the second group. It is they who represent the international Communist movement on the youth and student front


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/CIA-RDP78-00915R000500380002-3.pdf
	"FRONT" ORGANIZATIONS IN FEVER

	The various international "front" organizations controlled by Communists have been badly shaken by Russia's onslaught in Hungary. Their Soviet masters have tried to get the "fronts" to concentrate exclusively on Egypt, but have failed. The whole elaborate structure patiently built up in Stalin's time now seems endangered. If it gives way, a huge gap will be torn in Moscow's propaganda network.

	The principle on which the "fronts" were constructed was that (a) ultimate control must always remain safely in Communist hands, but (b) gullible non-Communists must be drawn in in sufficient numbers to mask the organizations' real nature. These principles apply to the World Federation of Democratic Youth


http://www.freedomtoquestion.org/supplemental_materials/2003_ga_youth_leadership_panel.htm
	Speaker: Leon Hopper

	...the discussion was permeated with the question of whether the AUY could continue to participate in the World Federation of Democratic Youth, or whether we should withdraw from an organization that was supposedly a Communist front, to participate in the World Assembly of Youth. 


http://archives.chicagotribune.com/1970/08/06/page/170/article/u-n-youth-assembly-fails-to-shake-older-generation
	UN. 'Youth Assembly Fails to Shake Older Generation 

	...'The United Nations first World Assembly of Youth that Butler raised $225,000 to help stage last month in New York was called "a circus" by one of its participants, on a Stop in Chicago last week.

	Ariel Whine, 26, who represented Israel at the two-week assembly, called it "a gross distortion of the U. N. General Assembly. The communists dominated the sessions and nothing at all was achieved but political propagandizing. 


http://www.freedomtoquestion.org/supplemental_materials/2003_ga_youth_leadership_panel.htm
	Speaker: Leon Hopper

	...The issue was not what to do. The matter was that we were focused beyond our own continent, to a different continent.

	...the international and global outreach for the program, and I believe that that's even more important in the days that we face today. If we are to help our youth move into a world which is a global reality we need an opportunity to provide them with that contact and that outreach. That's my experience and my reflection, and I thank you for the opportunity.








	The religion to which Stanley Ann was exposed as a teenager was Christian and liberal. Along with the Stenhouses, the Dunhams were among a group of families on Mercer Island that attended East Shore Unitarian Church in Bellevue, known for a while during that period as “the little red church on the hill.” It had been started in the late 1940s in an old kindergarten building on Mercer Island and then in a funeral chapel in Bellevue by several families, including Stanley and Madelyn’s bridge partners, the Farners.

	...Its youth groups, in which Stanley Ann took part, attended services at other churches and synagogues, then would “come back and do comparative religion,” said Iona Stenhouse. They would “talk about world religions, good works, what we could do in the world as we got older.” Jane Waddell Morris, who attended the youth groups with Stanley Ann, told me that she herself had become, through the East Shore experience, “a lifelong seeker,” aware of spirituality around her but not committed to an organized religion (just as Stanley Ann would be described, I noticed, many years later as an adult).


"freethinker-bohemian"








Whatever the extent of Moscow's influence over Davis, it's clear that Obama saw Davis as an influence. Obama portrays Davis (who he calls "Frank" in his book) as a guide in times of uncertainty over the course of what Obama views as his life journey:


http://en.bookfi.net/book/1187382
	Dreams from My Father: A Story of Race and Inheritance

	Barack Obama

	...Even Frank thought I had a bad attitude, although he was less than clear about how I should change it.

	What had Frank called college? An advanced degree in compromise. I thought back to the last time I had seen the old poet, a few days before I left Hawaii.

	...It made me smile, thinking back on Frank and his old Black Power, dashiki self.

	...I can construct a certain logic to my decision, show how becoming an organizer was a part of that larger narrative, starting with my father and his father before him, my mother and her parents, my memories of Indonesia with its beggars and farmers and the loss of Lolo to power, on through Ray and Frank ...I can see that my choices were never truly mine alone-and that that is how it should be

	...I imagined Frank in a baggy suit and wide lapels, standing in front of the old Regal Theatre ...I made a chain between my life and the faces I saw, borrowing other people’s memories.

	...Anger at the leaders for being short-sighted. Anger at myself for believing I could have ever bridged the gap between them. I suddenly remembered what Frank had told me that night back in Hawaii, after I had heard that Toot was scared of a black man.

	That’s the way it is, he had said. You might as well get used to it.

	...It was into my father’s image, the black man, son of Africa, that I’d packed all the attributes I sought in myself, the attributes of Martin and Malcolm, DuBois and Mandela. And if later I saw that the black men I knew-Frank or Ray or Will or Rafiq-fell short of such lofty standards; if I had learned to respect these men for the struggles they went through, recognizing them as my own





------


http://obamaspeeches.com/001-2002-Speech-Against-the-Iraq-War-Obama-Speech.htm
	October 2002 Barack Obama's
	2002 Speech Against the Iraq War

	...You want a fight, President Bush? Let's fight to make sure that...we vigorously enforce a nonproliferation treaty, and that former enemies and current allies like Russia


https://www.cbsnews.com/news/text-obamas-speech-in-russia/
	July 7, 2009
	
	President Obama today delivered a speech at the New Economic School on his vision for the U.S.-Russia relationship. Here are some key quotes from the address:

	...I speak to you today with deep respect for Russia's timeless heritage. Russian writers have helped us understand the complexity of the human experience, and recognize eternal truths.

	...These are contributions that are not contained by Russia's borders, as vast as those borders are. Indeed, Russia's heritage has touched every corner of the world, and speaks to the humanity that we share. That includes my own country, which has been blessed with Russian immigrants for decades; we've been enriched by Russian culture, and enhanced by Russian cooperation.

	...you are the last generation born when the world was divided. At that time, the American and Soviet armies were still massed in Europe, trained and ready to fight. The ideological trenches of the last century were roughly in place.

	...And then, within a few short years, the world as it was ceased to be. Now, make no mistake: This change did not come from any one nation. The Cold War reached a conclusion because of the actions of many nations over many years, and because the people of Russia and Eastern Europe stood up and decided that its end would be peaceful.

	...In a new Russia, the disappearance of old political and economic restrictions after the end of the Soviet Union brought both opportunity and hardship. A few prospered, but many more did not. There were tough times. But the Russian people showed strength and made sacrifices, and you achieved hard-earned progress through a growing economy and greater confidence. And despite painful times, many in Eastern Europe and Russia are much better off today than 20 years ago.

	We see that progress here at NES -- a school founded with Western support that is now distinctly Russian; a place of learning and inquiry where the test of an idea is not whether it is Russian or American or European, but whether it works. Above all, we see that progress in all of you -- young people with a young century to shape as you see fit.

	Your lifetime coincides with this era of transition. But think about the fundamental questions asked when this school was founded. What kind of future is Russia going to have? What kind of future are Russia and America going to have together? What world order will replace the Cold War? Those questions still don't have clear answers, and so now they must be answered by you -- by your generation in Russia, in America, and around the world. You get to decide. And while I cannot answer those questions for you, I can speak plainly about the future that America is seeking.

	To begin with, let me be clear: America wants a strong, peaceful, and prosperous Russia. This belief is rooted in our respect for the Russian people, and a shared history between our nations that goes beyond competition. Despite our past rivalry, our people were allies in the greatest struggle of the last century. Recently, I noted this when I was in Normandy -- for just as men from Boston and Birmingham risked all that they had to storm those beaches and scale those cliffs, Soviet soldiers from places like Kazan and Kiev endured unimaginable hardships to repeal -- to repel an invasion, and turn the tide in the east. As President John Kennedy said, "No nation in history of battle ever suffered more than the Soviet Union in the Second World War."

	So as we honor this past, we also recognize the future benefit that will come from a strong and vibrant Russia. Think of the issues that will define your lives: security from nuclear weapons and extremism; access to markets and opportunity; health and the environment; an international system that protects sovereignty and human rights, while promoting stability and prosperity. These challenges demand global partnership, and that partnership will be stronger if Russia occupies its rightful place as a great power.

	...As I said in Cairo, given our independence, any world order that -- given our interdependence, any world order that tries to elevate one nation or one group of people over another will inevitably fail. The pursuit of power is no longer a zero-sum game -- progress must be shared.

	That's why I have called for a "reset" in relations between the United States and Russia. This must be more than a fresh start between the Kremlin and the White House -- though that is important and I've had excellent discussions with both your President and your Prime Minister. It must be a sustained effort among the American and Russian people to identify mutual interests, and expand dialogue and cooperation that can pave the way to progress.

	This will not be easy. It's difficult to forge a lasting partnership between former adversaries, it's hard to change habits that have been ingrained in our governments and our bureaucracies for decades. But I believe that on the fundamental issues that will shape this century, Americans and Russians share common interests that form a basis for cooperation.

	...We meet in the midst of the worst global recession in a generation. I believe that the free market is the greatest force for creating and distributing wealth that the world has known. But wherever the market is allowed to run rampant -- through excessive risk-taking, a lack of regulation, or corruption -- then all are endangered, whether we live on the Mississippi or on the Volga.

	...There is extraordinary potential for increased cooperation between Americans and Russians. We can pursue trade that is free and fair and integrated with the wider world. We can boost investment that creates jobs in both our countries, we can forge partnerships on energy that tap not only traditional resources, like oil and gas, but new sources of energy that will drive growth and combat climate change. All of that, Americans and Russians can do together.

	...And that leads me to the final area that I will discuss, which is America's interest in an international system that advances cooperation while respecting the sovereignty of all nations.

	State sovereignty must be a cornerstone of international order. Just as all states should have the right to choose their leaders, states must have the right to borders that are secure, and to their own foreign policies. That is true for Russia, just as it is true for the United States. Any system that cedes those rights will lead to anarchy. That's why we must apply this principle to all nations -- and that includes nations like Georgia and Ukraine. America will never impose a security arrangement on another country. For any country to become a member of an organization like NATO, for example, a majority of its people must choose to; they must undertake reforms; they must be able to contribute to the Alliance's mission. And let me be clear: NATO should be seeking collaboration with Russia, not confrontation.

	....I know that this future can seem distant. Change is hard. In the words of that NES student back in 1993, the real world is not so rational as on paper. But think of the change that has unfolded with the passing of time. One hundred years ago, a czar ruled Russia, and Europe was a place of empire.

	...Every country charts its own course. Russia has cut its way through time like a mighty river through a canyon, leaving an indelible mark on human history as it goes. As you move this story forward, look to the future that can be built if we refuse to be burdened by the old obstacles and old suspicions; look to the future that can be built if we partner on behalf of the aspirations we hold in common. Together, we can build a world where people are protected, prosperity is enlarged, and our power truly serves progress. And it is all in your hands. Good luck to all of you. Thank you very much.


------


http://abcnews.go.com/blogs/headlines/2012/11/kremlin-cheers-obamas-re-election/
	Kremlin Cheers Obama's Re-Election

	November 7, 2012

	...It is perhaps not surprising that the Kremlin is pleased with the outcome of the election, especially since President Obama told then-President Dmitri Medvedev earlier this year that he would have more flexibility after the election to negotiate NATO plans to place components of a missile-defense shield in Eastern Europe.



Some right-wing writers have flooded fake news sites (and google's search results) with alarmist articles on Obama's relationship with the communist activist Frank Marshall Davis, who was a mentor to Obama since his childhood. But most of these articles are alarmist for the wrong reasons--that Obama was likely instilled with Communist ideas in his childhood is interesting, and even a cause for concern, but a more interesting question is: what was the intent of the people who tried to influence him? And, related to that, why was Obama brought to meet Davis in the first place?




------


http://www.hawaii.edu/uhwo/clear/HonoluluRecord1/frankblog1950.html
	...February 9: 1950: Onward with the Hydrogen Bomb

	...Temporarily balked but not defeated, our dividend diplomats, with the willing hands of President Truman, went into the crisis-making business. If Molotov coughed, it threatened our "security" in Iran. If Vishinsky laughed, we were "endangered" in Korea. By laying down the proper propaganda barrage, we were soon able to by-pass the United Nations and island-hop our way from the Truman Doctrine to Greece and Turkey to the Atlantic Pact. We manufacture crises so rapidly that a new one is shoved in front of us before we can examine yesterday's or the one rushed in this morning.

	We have done these things, we said, rattling our atom bombs, because we love peace.

	But we, too, love peace, said the men in the Kremlin. Your productive capacity was unscathed and came out of the war greater than ever before in the whole history of mankind. It will take us years to restore the losses sustained by Russian industry from the German blitz; Let's get together, talk this thing but and settle our differences amicably so that we can all go about the business of making the world safe forever from another war. Peace we want above all else, said Uncle Joe in messages to America.

	Real Peace Is "Expensive Luxury"

	While the hopes of our people rose at these words, our dividend diplomats recoiled in horror. If the ideological conflict between our side and the Soviets was brought to an end, what would happen to our giant corporations getting fat contracts to make materials of war and products for the anti-Communists of Europe? With no brink-of-war economy, how could General Motors make $600,000,000 in one year in the face of rising unemployment? What would our generals and admirals think? No, real peace is an expensive luxury that the big stockholders and professional soldiers can't afford.

	So, trembling with fear, our dividend diplomats told us that we cannot trust the Russians when they speak of peace.

	...Then one day President Truman announced that the Russians had the atomic bomb. Our dividend diplomats wrung their hands but the people breathed more easily. If both sides had it, the chances of a hot war were quite remote. Neither would start anything for fear of retaliation by the other. Maybe there would be peace at last.
